Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 2.
Special Education.

§ 22.1-218.1. Duty to process placements through the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children.

In order to protect the interests of the Commonwealth and local governments and provide for the safety and welfare of children with disabilities, all placements of children with disabilities facilitated by a school division in an out-of-state special education facility shall be processed through the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children as provided in Chapters 10 (§

63.2-1000

et seq.) and 11 (§

63.2-1100

et seq.) of Title 63.2.

(1983, c. 376; 1994, c. 854.)